District of Columbia statutes.
47-2109

Regulations.

The Council of the District of Columbia is authorized to promulgate regulations to carry out the purposes of this chapter including, without limitation, regulations limiting the period of time a closing-out sale or a sale of goods, wares, or merchandise damaged by fire, smoke, water, or otherwise may be conducted, subject to extension as authorized by § 47-2105; provided, that no such regulation shall be put in effect until after a public hearing has been held thereon.

History

Sept. 1, 1959, 73 Stat. 451, Pub. L. 86-219, § 9
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2109.
1973 Ed., § 47-3009.